Montana, session 2025, HB651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Temporary door locks -- limited exception to fire code. (1) A temporary door locking
device may be used in a public building as defined in 50-60-101 to secure a door to a room that may be used
during a shelter-in-place or emergency lockdown situation.
(2) A temporary door locking device may be used to secure a fire exit, hallway, corridor, or
entranceway leading to a fire exit if the temporary door locking device:
(a) is used only during a shelter-in-place or emergency lockdown situation; and
(b) is approved by the local fire department, law enforcement agency, or code official that has
jurisdiction over the building.
(3) As used in this section, "temporary door locking device" means a device that prevents a door
from opening, provided that the device:
(a) is meant only for temporary emergency use during an active threat situation;
(b) can be engaged or removed without opening the door;
(c) can be engaged and removed from the egress side of the door without the use of a key and
removed from the ingress side of the door with the use of a key or other credential;
(d) does not modify the door closer, panic hardware, or fire exit hardware;
(e) is not permanently mounted to the door assembly, although individual parts of the device
assembly, including but not limited to bolts, stops, brackets, and pins that do not prevent normal function of the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 651
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 651
door, may be permanently mounted;
(f) is installed at a height not to exceed 48 inches above the floor;
(g) does not affect the fire rating of the door and complies with national fire protection association
fire rating standards;
(h) can be removed with a single operation when engaged;
(i) is applied only for a finite period of time during an emergency situation, including but not limited
to a shelter-in-place or emergency lockdown situation or drill; and
(j) is integrated into building safety plans, drills, and training programs that include inservice
training on the use of the device for building staff and first responders.
Section 2. Section 50-61-106, MCA, is amended to read:
"50-61-106. Unlawful to obstruct fire exit. It Except as provided in [section 1], it is unlawful to
obstruct in any manner any fire exit, or any hallway, corridor, or entranceway leading to a fire exit, required by
rules adopted by the department of justice."
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
50, chapter 61, part 1, and the provisions of Title 50, chapter 61, part 1, apply to [section 1].
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 651
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 651, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 651
INTRODUCED BY A. REGIER
AN ACT ALLOWING FOR THE USE OF TEMPORARY DOOR LOCKS DURING SHELTER-IN-PLACE OR
EMERGENCY LOCKDOWN SITUATIONS; PROVIDING AN EXCEPTION TO THE FIRE CODE; PROVIDING A
DEFINITION; AMENDING SECTION 50-61-106, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”